Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska48-3007
Request; form; contents.

A request for
job training reimbursements may be filed annually or quarterly by the employer
on a form required by the director. Each request shall contain verification
of the number of qualifying employees, designated by project, for which the
employer has met the requirements of the Teleworker Job Creation Act, and
such amounts shall be paid to the employer upon approval by the director.

Laws 2010, LB1081, § 7.